Massachusetts, session 194th, S2957.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) A candidate for mayor or councilor-at-large in the city of Brockton shall
have resided within the city for at least 1 year immediately preceding such candidate’s election.
If a person holding the position of mayor or councilor-at-large ceases to reside in the city, such
person shall be removed from office and the office declared vacant.
(b) A candidate for ward councilor or school committee member in the city of Brockton
shall have resided within the ward for which such candidate is seeking election for at least 1 year
immediately preceding such candidate’s election. If a person holding the position of ward
councilor or school committee member ceases to reside in the ward for which such person was
elected, such person shall be removed from office and the office declared vacant.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1